Nevada, session 83, SB223.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 201.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
201.300 1. A person who without physical force or the
immediate threat of physical force, induces an adult to unlawfully
become a prostitute or to continue to engage in prostitution, or to
enter any place within this State in which prostitution is practiced,
encouraged or allowed for the purpose of sexual conduct or
prostitution is guilty of pandering which is a category C felony and
shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130. This subsection does
not apply to the customer of a prostitute.
2. A person:
(a) Is guilty of sex trafficking if the person:
(1) Induces, causes, recruits, harbors, transports, provides,
obtains or maintains a child to engage in prostitution, or to enter any
place within this State in which prostitution is practiced, encouraged
or allowed for the purpose of sexual conduct or prostitution;
(2) Induces, recruits, harbors, transports, provides, obtains or
maintains a person by any means, knowing, or in reckless disregard
of the fact, that threats, violence, force, intimidation, fraud, duress
or coercion will be used to cause the person to engage in
prostitution, or to enter any place within this State in which
prostitution is practiced, encouraged or allowed for the purpose of
sexual conduct or prostitution;
(3) By threats, violence, force, intimidation, fraud, duress,
coercion, by any device or scheme, or by abuse of any position of
confidence or authority, or having legal charge, takes, places,
harbors, induces, causes, compels or procures a person to engage in
prostitution, or to enter any place within this State in which
prostitution is practiced, encouraged or allowed for the purpose of
sexual conduct or prostitution;
(4) Takes or detains a person with the intent to compel the
person by force, violence, threats or duress to marry him or her or
any other person; or
(5) Receives anything of value with the specific intent of
facilitating a violation of this paragraph.
-
*SB223*

– 3 –
(b) Who is found guilty of sex trafficking:
(1) An adult is guilty of a category B felony and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of
not less than 3 years and a maximum term of not more than 10
years, and may be further punished by a fine of not more than
$10,000.
(2) A child:
(I) If the child is less than 14 years of age when the
offense is committed, is guilty of a category A felony and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life without the
possibility of parole, or for life with the possibility of parole [,] with
eligibility for parole beginning when a minimum of [15] 20 years
has been served, and may be further punished by a fine of not more
than [$20,000.] $40,000.
(II) If the child is at least 14 years of age but less than 16
years of age when the offense is committed, is guilty of a category
A felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison
for life with the possibility of parole, with eligibility for parole
beginning when a minimum of [10] 15 years has been served, and
may be further punished by a fine of not more than [$10,000.]
$20,000.
(III) If the child is at least 16 years of age but less than 18
years of age when the offense is committed, is guilty of a category
A felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison
for life with the possibility of parole, with eligibility for parole
beginning when a minimum of [5] 10 years has been served, and
may be further punished by a fine of not more than [$10,000.]
$20,000.
3. A court shall not grant probation to or suspend the sentence
of a person convicted of sex trafficking a child pursuant to
subsection 2.
4. Consent of a victim of pandering or sex trafficking to an act
of prostitution is not a defense to a prosecution for any of the acts
prohibited by this section.
5. In a prosecution for sex trafficking a child pursuant to
subsection 2, it is not a defense that the defendant did not have
knowledge of the victim’s age, nor is reasonable mistake of age a
valid defense to a prosecution conducted pursuant to subsection 2.
Sec. 2. NRS 201.301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
201.301 1. A person is guilty of facilitating sex trafficking if
the person:
(a) Facilitates, arranges, provides or pays for the transportation
of a person to or within this State with the intent of:
-
*SB223*

– 4 –
(1) Inducing the person to engage in prostitution in violation
of subparagraph (1), (2) or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 201.300;
(2) Inducing the person to enter any place within this State in
which prostitution is practiced, encouraged or allowed for the
purpose of sexual conduct or prostitution in violation of
subparagraph (1), (2) or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS
201.300; or
(3) If the person is a child, using the person for any act that is
prohibited by NRS 200.710 or 200.720;
(b) Sells travel services that facilitate the travel of another
person to this State with the knowledge that the other person is
traveling to this State for the purpose of:
(1) Engaging in sexual conduct with a person who has been
induced to engage in sexual conduct or prostitution in violation
of subparagraph (1), (2) or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 201.300;
(2) Soliciting a child who has been induced to engage in
sexual conduct or prostitution in violation of subparagraph (1), (2)
or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 201.300; or
(3) Engaging in any act involving a child that is prohibited
by NRS 200.710 or 200.720; or
(c) Travels to or within this State by any means with the intent
of engaging in:
(1) Sexual conduct with a person who has been induced to
engage in sexual conduct or prostitution in violation of
subparagraph (1), (2) or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS
201.300, with the knowledge that such a person has been induced to
engage in such sexual conduct or prostitution; or
(2) Any act involving a child that is prohibited by NRS
200.710 or 200.720.
2. A person who is found guilty of facilitating sex trafficking is
guilty of a category B felony and:
(a) If the victim is 18 years of age or older, shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years.
(b) If the victim is less than 18 years of age, shall be punished
by imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of [not less
than 3] 8 years and a maximum term of [not more than 10] 20 years.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB223*